Utah statutes.
63G-6-301.   Rules and regulations for specifications of supplies.
Rules and regulations shall be promulgated to govern the preparation,
maintenance, and content of specifications for supplies, services, and
construction required by the state.  Rules and regulations shall determine the
extent to which a nonemployee who has prepared specifications for use by the
state may participate in any state procurement using such specifications.
